District of Columbia statutes.
44-1004.02

Mandamus.

A resident, a resident’s representative, the Long-Term Care Ombudsman, or the licensee or administrator of a facility may bring an action in court for mandamus to order the Mayor or any District government agency to comply with subchapter III of this chapter, any rule issued by the Mayor pursuant to that subchapter, or any other District or federal law relevant to the operation of a facility or the care of its residents. Any person bringing an action under this section shall give the Mayor at least 5 days advance notice (excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and legal holidays) before the action is filed in court.

Apr. 18, 1986, D.C. Law 6-108, § 402, 33 DCR 1510
1981 Ed., § 32-1452.